Hawaii statutes.
§653-10 Superiors and successors of
garnishee. The obligations and inhibitions imposed upon the garnishee
shall be equally binding upon the garnishee's official superiors and
successors, to whose notice the fact shall come, of the service upon the garnishee.
[L 1890, c 50, §9; RL 1925, §2854; RL 1935, §4299; RL 1945, §10330; RL 1955,
§238-10; HRS §653-10; gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next